Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7150.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-2 of the General Laws entitled "General Powers" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-2-71. Regulation of powered landscape equipment.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of a municipal charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation to
the contrary, no city or town shall enact or enforce any ordinance or regulation that prohibits, bans,
or otherwise restricts the sale, purchase, ownership, or use of powered landscape equipment based
solely upon the type of fuel or power source used by such equipment.
(b) For purposes of this section, “powered landscape equipment” shall include, but not be
limited to, leaf blowers, lawn mowers, string trimmers, hedge trimmers, edgers, and similar outdoor
maintenance equipment, whether powered by gasoline, diesel, electricity, battery, or other energy
source.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city or town from adopting or
enforcing:
(1) Reasonable, content-neutral noise regulations of general applicability;
(2) Restrictions on hours of operation applicable to all powered equipment; or
(3) Regulations necessary to address public safety concerns, provided such regulations do
not effectively prohibit the use of powered landscape equipment based on fuel type.
(d) Grandfathering. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any ordinance or
regulation of a city or town that was duly adopted and in effect prior to the effective date of this

section and that prohibits or restricts powered landscape equipment based on fuel or power source,
including any municipal ban, shall remain valid and enforceable within that municipality; provided
that, such ordinance or regulation is not amended, expanded, or reenacted after the effective date
of this section.
(e) Any ordinance or regulation adopted, amended, expanded, or reenacted after the
effective date of this section that is inconsistent with the provisions herein shall be deemed null and
void.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003581
========
LC003581 - Page 2 of 3